Massachusetts, session 194th, H4609.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 244 the following section:- 
Section 245. (a) The department shall create a surveillance case definition for Long 
COVID also known as post-acute sequelae of SARS-CoV-2 (PASC) that aligns with the 
definition established by the National Academies of Sciences, Engineering, and Medicine 
(NASEM) and the diverse associated conditions as described in it. 
(b) The department shall determine the most effective and efficient method to conduct 
active surveillance on the condition known as Long COVID (PASC) to better understand its 
prevalence and impact on the Commonwealth’s population and health care systems and inform 
public health interventions.  
(c) The department shall develop a case report form to support these active surveillance 
efforts. This case report form may collect the following information on patients diagnosed with 
Long COVID (PASC): (i) gender identity, (ii) race, (iii) year of birth, (iv) county of residence, 

of 2 14 (v) state of residence (vi) primary language, (vii) presenting symptom(s) or condition(s) allowing 
for the diagnosis, (viii) date of initial infection with COVID-19, (ix) date of onset of Long 
COVID (PASC) symptoms, (xii) county of diagnosis, and (xiii) any diseases associated with 
Long COVID, including but not limited to, myalgic encephalomyelitis/chronic fatigue syndrome, 
heart disease, postural orthostatic tachycardia syndrome, mast cell activation syndrome, 
fibromyalgia, diabetes, and hyperlipidemia. The case report form may collect information on 
treatment received and referrals provided. 
(d) The department shall commence active public health surveillance of Long COVID 
(PASC) six months after enactment of this act. The department shall determine the frequency to 
make statewide surveillance reports available to the public, no less than on an annual basis.  
(e) Not later than one year after the enactment of this act, the department shall provide a 
report to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and to the chairs of the joint 
committee on public health on the progress of the commonwealth’s Long COVID (PASC) 
surveillance efforts. The report shall include the status of the development and dissemination of a 
surveillance form, the department outreach and education on Long COVID (PASC) surveillance, 
and initial surveillance results.